Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-2,207
Effect of certificate of authority.

(MBCA 15.05) (a) A certificate
of authority authorizes the foreign corporation to which it is issued to transact
business in this state subject, however, to the right of the state to revoke
the certificate as provided in the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act.

(b) A foreign corporation
with a valid certificate of authority has the same but no greater rights and
has the same but no greater privileges as and, except as otherwise provided
by the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act, is subject to the same duties,
restrictions, penalties, and liabilities now or later imposed on a domestic
corporation of like character.

(c) The Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act does
not authorize this state to regulate the organization or internal affairs
of a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 207.